Utah statutes.
17-19a-202.   General duties.

A county auditor shall perform:

(1)  in accordance with Section 17-19a-205, an accounting duty or service described in this chapter or otherwise required by law;

(2)  an auditing duty or service described in this chapter or otherwise required by law; and

(3)  other duties as may be required by law.



Enacted by Chapter 17, 2012 General Session

